Massachusetts, session 194th, H1655.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
SECTION 1. Section 66 of chapter 10 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by 
inserting, after the words “chapter 90” the following: - "and all revenues received by the 
commonwealth from public and private sources as gifts, grants and donations" 
SECTION 2. Section 66A of chapter 10 of the General Laws, is hereby amended by 
inserting, after the words “chapter 272” the following: - "and all revenues received by the 
commonwealth from public and private sources as gifts, grants and donations"